Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.100

Examination requirements.

An original certificate or license shall be issued to persons who have satisfactorily passed the written examination as endorsed by the Appraiser Qualifications Board of the Appraisal Foundation and as adopted by the director.

[ 2005 c 339 s 7; 1993 c 30 s 10; 1989 c 414 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.